Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.154

Manager-managed limited liability companies.

(1) If the limited liability company is manager-managed:

(a) Management of the activities of the limited liability company is vested in one or more managers; and

(b) Each manager of the limited liability company:

(i) Is designated, appointed, elected, removed, or replaced by a vote, approval, or consent of a majority of the members;

(ii) Need not be a member of the limited liability company or a natural person; and

(iii) Unless the manager has been earlier removed or has earlier resigned, holds office until a successor has been elected.

(2) If the limited liability company is manager-managed:

(a) Each manager is an agent of the limited liability company and has the authority to bind the limited liability company with regard to matters in the ordinary course of its activities; and

(b) No member, acting solely in its capacity as a member, is an agent of the limited liability company.

(3) If the manager is a board, committee, or other group of persons:

(a) Subsection (1)(b) of this section applies to each person included in such board, committee, or other group of persons; and

(b) No person acting solely in such person's capacity as a participant in such board, committee, or other group of persons is an agent of the limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 32.]